Alabama, session 2026rs, HB548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the Automotive Supply Chain Resilience and Expansion Act.
Page 1

the Automotive Supply Chain Resilience and Expansion Act.
HB548 INTRODUCED
Section 2. It is the intent of the Legislature to
provide strategic support to the automotive manufacturing
sector in response to disruptions caused by federal tariffs
and global trade instability.
Section 3. For the purpose of this act, the following
terms and phrases have the following meanings:
(1) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of Commerce.
(2) ELIGIBLE ENTITY. Any Alabama manufacturer or
supplier operating in the state.
(3) TARIFF-RELATED DISRUPTION. Increased costs, reduced
revenues, or supply interruptions resulting directly or
indirectly from federal tariffs or foreign retaliatory
measures.
Section 4. (a) The Automotive Tariff Relief Grant
Program and the Automotive Tariff Relief Grant Fund are
established and shall be administered by the department.
(b) Grant funds may be used for:
(1) Cost mitigation;
(2) Inventory diversification;
(3) Workforce retention; or
(4) Capital improvement.
(c) Grants shall be awarded to eligible entities that
demonstrate hardship due to tariff-related disruptions.
(d) The aggregate amount of grants awarded pursuant to
this section shall not exceed ten million dollars
($10,000,000) in a calendar year.
(e) The department shall establish rules for
application procedures and documentation requirements.
Page 2

application procedures and documentation requirements.
HB548 INTRODUCED
Section 5. (a) A refundable income tax credit, known as
the Supply Chain Relocation and Expansion Tax Credit, may be
claimed by eligible entities that relocate critical supply
operations, expand domestic sourcing within the state, or
invest in technology or equipment that mitigates reliance on
tariff-affected imports.
(b) The amount of any income tax credit shall not
exceed 30 percent of qualifying investment expenditures.
(c) The income tax credit authorized by this act is
limited to an aggregate amount for all taxpayers of ten
million dollars ($10,000,000) annually.
(d) The income tax credit is nontransferable and may be
carried forward for up to five years.
(e)(1) The income tax credit allowed under this section
shall be effective beginning January 1, 2027, for the 2027 tax
year, and shall continue through the 2029 tax year, except for
carry-forward as provided in subsection (d).
(2) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this
subsection, a business shall not claim this income tax credit
for more than three tax years.
(f) The Alabama Department of Revenue may adopt rules
for the implementation and administration of this section.
Section 6. (a) The Supply Chain Relocation and
Expansion Loan Program is established and shall be
administered by the department.
(b) Low-interest loans shall be provided to eligible
entities.
(c) The amount of any low-interest loan shall not
Page 3

(c) The amount of any low-interest loan shall not
HB548 INTRODUCED
exceed 30 percent of qualifying investment expenditures.
(d) The department shall establish rules for
application procedures and documentation requirements.
Section 7. (a) The Export Market Diversification
Program which will expand export support services to eligible
entities seeking new international markets is established and
shall be administered by the department.
(b) Services may include export financing assistance,
trade mission subsidies, foreign regulatory compliance, and
market entry consulting.
(c) Priority shall be given to businesses impacted by
foreign retaliatory tariffs.
Section 8. (a) State procurement agencies may adjust
bid scoring to reflect cost increases from tariffs, grant
temporary preference to domestic suppliers impacted by trade
100 measures, and modify contract requirements to allow use of
101 alternative materials.
102 (b) The Alabama Department of Finance shall issue
103 implementing guidelines by October 1, 2026.
104 Section 9. (a) There is established the Automotive
105 Resilience Task Force.
106 (b) The task force shall:
107 (1) Monitor federal trade actions and foreign
108 retaliatory measures;
109 (2) Assess economic impact on the automotive sector;
110 and
111 (3) Recommend policy responses and industry
112 adaptations.
Page 4

adaptations.
HB548 INTRODUCED
113 (c) The task force shall consist of five members, each
114 appointed by the Governor.
115 (d) The first meeting to be held by September 1, 2026,
116 and shall meet no less than annually and otherwise as
117 necessary.
118 (e) The task force shall report bi annually to the
119 Governor and the Legislature on its activities, findings, and
120 recommendations.
121 Section 10. Sections 1 through 4 and Sections 6 through
122 8 of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2027. Section
123 5 of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2027,
124 contingent on the ratification of an amendment to the
125 Constitution of Alabama of 2022, proposed in the 2026 Regular
126 Session, authorizing the Alabama Department of Commerce to
127 provide low-interest loans to eligible entities.
Page 5